Illinois, session 104th, SB3430.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Local Pension Obligation Acceleration 8Bond Fund. 9    Section 5. The General Obligation Bond Act is amended by 10changing Sections 2 and 2.5 and by adding Section 7.8 as 11follows: 12    (30 ILCS 330/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 652)13    Sec. 2. Authorization for Bonds. The State of Illinois is 14authorized to issue, sell and provide for the retirement of 15General Obligation Bonds of the State of Illinois for the 16categories and specific purposes expressed in Sections 2 17through 8 of this Act, in the total amount of $83,364,839,969 18$82,664,839,969.19    The bonds authorized in this Section 2 and in Section 16 of 20this Act are herein called "Bonds".21    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, up to   SB3430- 2 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1$2,200,000,000 in aggregate original principal amount may be 2issued and sold in accordance with the Baccalaureate Savings 3Act in the form of General Obligation College Savings Bonds.4    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, up to 5$300,000,000 in aggregate original principal amount may be 6issued and sold in accordance with the Retirement Savings Act 7in the form of General Obligation Retirement Savings Bonds.8    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, the 9additional $10,000,000,000 authorized by Public Act 93-2, the 10$3,466,000,000 authorized by Public Act 96-43, and the 11$4,096,348,300 authorized by Public Act 96-1497 shall be used 12solely as provided in Section 7.2.13    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, the 14additional $6,000,000,000 authorized by Public Act 100-23 15shall be used solely as provided in Section 7.6 and shall be 16issued by December 31, 2017. 17    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, 18$2,200,000,000 of the additional amount authorized by Public 19Act 100-587, Public Act 102-718, and this amendatory Act of 20the 104th General Assembly shall be used solely as provided in 21Section 7.7.22    Of the total amount of Bonds authorized in this Act, 23$700,000,000 of the additional amount authorized by this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall be used 25solely as provided in Section 7.8.26    The issuance and sale of Bonds pursuant to the General   SB3430- 3 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1Obligation Bond Act is an economical and efficient method of 2financing the long-term capital needs of the State. This Act 3will permit the issuance of a multi-purpose General Obligation 4Bond with uniform terms and features. This will not only lower 5the cost of registration but also reduce the overall cost of 6issuing debt by improving the marketability of Illinois 7General Obligation Bonds.8(Source: P.A. 103-7, eff. 7-1-23; 103-591, eff. 7-1-24; 104-8, 9eff. 1-1-26.) 10    (30 ILCS 330/2.5)11    Sec. 2.5. Limitation on issuance of Bonds.12    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no Bonds may be 13issued if, after the issuance, in the next State fiscal year 14after the issuance of the Bonds, the amount of debt service 15(including principal, whether payable at maturity or pursuant 16to mandatory sinking fund installments, and interest) on all 17then-outstanding Bonds, other than (i) Bonds authorized by 18Public Act 100-23, (ii) Bonds issued by Public Act 96-43, 19(iii) Bonds authorized by Public Act 96-1497, (iv) Bonds 20authorized by Public Act 100-587, and (v) Bonds authorized by 21Public Act 102-718 this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 22Assembly, and (vi) Bonds authorized by this amendatory Act of 23the 104th General Assembly, would exceed 7% of the aggregate 24appropriations from the general funds, the State Construction 25Account Fund, and the Road Fund for the fiscal year   SB3430- 4 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1immediately prior to the fiscal year of the issuance. For the 2purposes of this subsection (a), "general funds" has the same 3meaning as ascribed to that term under Section 50-40 of the 4State Budget Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 5    (b) If the Comptroller and Treasurer each consent in 6writing, Bonds may be issued even if the issuance does not 7comply with subsection (a). In addition, $2,000,000,000 in 8Bonds for the purposes set forth in Sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, 9and $2,000,000,000 in Refunding Bonds under Section 16, may be 10issued during State fiscal year 2017 without complying with 11subsection (a). In addition, $2,000,000,000 in Bonds for the 12purposes set forth in Sections 3, 4, 5, 6, and 7, and 13$2,000,000,000 in Refunding Bonds under Section 16, may be 14issued during State fiscal year 2018 without complying with 15subsection (a).16(Source: P.A. 101-30, eff. 6-28-19; 102-718, eff. 5-5-22.) 17    (30 ILCS 330/7.8 new)18    Sec. 7.8. Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bonds.19    (a) As used in this Section, "Local Pension Obligation 20Acceleration Bonds" means Bonds authorized by this amendatory 21Act of the 104th General Assembly and used for the purpose of 22making accelerated pension benefit payments under Articles 3, 234, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 11 of the Illinois Pension Code.24    (b) Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bonds in the 25amount of $700,000,000 are hereby authorized to be used for   SB3430- 5 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1the purpose of making accelerated pension benefit payments 2under Articles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 11 of the Illinois Pension 3Code.4    (c) The proceeds of Local Pension Obligation Acceleration 5Bonds authorized in subsection (b) of this Section, less the 6amounts authorized in the Bond Sale Order to be directly paid 7out for bond sale expenses under Section 8, shall be deposited 8directly into the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 9Fund, and the Comptroller and the Treasurer shall, as soon as 10practical, make accelerated pension benefit payments under 11Articles 3, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 11 of the Illinois Pension Code.12    (d) There is created the Local Pension Obligation 13Acceleration Bond Fund as a special fund in the State 14treasury. Funds deposited into the Local Pension Obligation 15Acceleration Bond Fund may only be used for the purpose of 16making accelerated pension benefit payments under Articles 3, 174, 5, 6, 7, 8, and 11 of the Illinois Pension Code. This 18subsection shall constitute an irrevocable and continuing 19appropriation of all amounts necessary for such purposes.20    (e) The Comptroller shall deduct the amount for the 21payment of principal and interest due on Local Pension 22Obligation Acceleration Bonds from any payment out of the 23Local Government Distributive Fund to the employer and shall 24pay the amount so deducted toward the principal and interest 25due on Local Pension Obligation Bonds.   SB3430- 6 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    Section 10. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by adding 2Sections 3-144.3, 3-144.4, 4-138.15, 4-138.16, 5-218.5, 35-218.6, 6-213.5, 6-213.6, 7-217.5, 7-217.6, 8-244.5, 8-244.6, 411-223.5, and 11-223.6 as follows: 5    (40 ILCS 5/3-144.3 new)6    Sec. 3-144.3. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 7of any pension benefit.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Eligible person" means a person who:10        (1) has terminated service;11        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 12    eligible to receive a retirement pension under this 13    Article;14        (3) has not received any retirement pension under this 15    Article; and16        (4) has not made the election under Section 3-144.4.17    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 18or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 19anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 20entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 21"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 22disability benefits.23    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fund shall 25calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions   SB3430- 7 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 2for each eligible person who requests that information and 3shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 4irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the fund 5to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 6benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 7shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 8receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 9subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 10person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 11year. The fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 12eligible person to notify him or her of the election.13    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 14elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 15amount that the fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 16receiving any pension benefit.17    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 18be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 19pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 20benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 21terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 22survivor, or other benefit.23    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 25under this Article, then:26        (1) Any benefits under the fund earned as a result of   SB3430- 8 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 2    person's creditable service arising from the return to 3    active service.4        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the fund, and the terminated creditable service 6    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.7    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 8benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 9be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 10account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 12taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 13receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 15rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 16under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.17    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 18receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section, the fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 20for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 21payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 22voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 23Fund to the fund, and the fund shall transfer the amount into 24the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.25    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 26rules, necessary to implement this Section.  SB3430- 9 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 2way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 3qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 4    (40 ILCS 5/3-144.4 new)5    Sec. 3-144.4. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 6reduction in annual retirement pension increases.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 9payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 10the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 11pension using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 12the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 13Tier 1 member's retirement pension using the formula provided 14under subsection (b-5).15    "Eligible person" means a person who:16        (1) is a Tier 1 member;17        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 18    pension under this Article;19        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 20    receiving a retirement pension under this Article;21        (4) has not received any retirement pension under this 22    Article; and23        (5) has not made the election under Section 3-144.3.24    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a police 25officer under this Article before January 1, 2011.  SB3430- 10 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 330, 2030, the fund shall implement an accelerated pension 4benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request 5of an eligible person, the fund shall calculate, using 6actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 7an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 8that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 9have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 10pension calculated in accordance with the formula provided 11under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 12benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 13made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 14a retirement pension otherwise payable under this Article.15    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 16retirement pension of a person who made the election under 17subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 18January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 19or the first anniversary of the pension start date, whichever 20is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 21the originally granted retirement pension.22    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 23benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 24then:25        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 26    increase in retirement pension shall be calculated in   SB3430- 11 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 2    (b-5); and3        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 4    repaid to the fund.5    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 6benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 7be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 8account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 9Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 10taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 11receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 12Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 13rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 14under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.15    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 16receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 17Section, the fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 18for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 19payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 20voucher to the fund, and the fund shall transfer the amount 21into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.22    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 23rules, necessary to implement this Section.24    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 25way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 26qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3430- 12 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (40 ILCS 5/4-138.15 new)2    Sec. 4-138.15. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 3of any pension benefit.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible person" means a person who:6        (1) has terminated service;7        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 8    eligible to receive a retirement pension under this 9    Article;10        (3) has not received any retirement pension under this 11    Article;12        (4) has not made the election under Section 4-138.16; 13    and14        (5) is the employee of a unit of local government that 15    receives payments out of the Local Government Distributive 16    Fund.17    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 18or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 19anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 20entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 21"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 22disability benefits.23    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fund shall 25calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions   SB3430- 13 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 2for each eligible person who requests that information and 3shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 4irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the fund 5to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 6benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 7shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 8receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 9subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 10person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 11year. The fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 12eligible person to notify him or her of the election.13    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 14elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 15amount that the fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 16receiving any pension benefit.17    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 18be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 19pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 20benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 21terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 22survivor, or other benefit.23    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 25under this Article, then:26        (1) Any benefits under the fund earned as a result of   SB3430- 14 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 2    person's creditable service arising from the return to 3    active service.4        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the fund, and the terminated creditable service 6    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.7    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 8benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 9be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 10account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 12taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 13receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 15rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 16under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.17    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 18receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section, the fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 20for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 21payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 22voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 23Fund to the fund, and the fund shall transfer the amount into 24the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.25    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 26rules, necessary to implement this Section.  SB3430- 15 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 2way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 3qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 4    (40 ILCS 5/4-138.16 new)5    Sec. 4-138.16. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 6reduction in annual retirement pension increases.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 9payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 10the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 11pension using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 12the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 13Tier 1 member's retirement pension using the formula provided 14under subsection (b-5).15    "Eligible person" means a person who:16        (1) is a Tier 1 member;17        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 18    pension under this Article;19        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 20    receiving a retirement pension under this Article;21        (4) has not received any retirement pension under this 22    Article;23        (5) has not made the election under Section 4-138.15; 24    and25        (6) is the employee of a unit of local government that   SB3430- 16 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    receives payments out of the Local Government Distributive 2    Fund.3    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 4firefighter before January 1, 2011.5    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 730, 2030, the fund shall implement an accelerated pension 8benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request 9of an eligible person, the fund shall calculate, using 10actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 11an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 12that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 13have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 14pension calculated in accordance with the formula provided 15under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 16benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 17made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 18a retirement pension otherwise payable under this Article.19    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 20retirement pension of a person who made the election under 21subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 22January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 23or the first anniversary of the pension start date, whichever 24is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 25the originally granted retirement pension.26    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension   SB3430- 17 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 2then:3        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 4    increase in retirement pension shall be calculated in 5    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 6    (b-5); and7        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 8    repaid to the fund.9    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 10benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 11be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 12account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 13Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 14taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 15receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 16Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 17rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 18under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.19    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 20receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 21Section, the fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 22for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 23payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 24voucher to the fund, and the fund shall transfer the amount 25into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.26    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency   SB3430- 18 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1rules, necessary to implement this Section.2    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 3way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 4qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 5    (40 ILCS 5/5-218.5 new)6    Sec. 5-218.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 7of any pension benefit.8    (a) As used in this Section:9    "Eligible person" means a person who:10        (1) has terminated service;11        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 12    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 13    Article;14        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 15    Article; and16        (4) has not made the election under Section 5-218.6.17    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 18or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 19anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 20entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 21"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 22disability benefits.23    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the fund shall 25calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions   SB3430- 19 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 2for each eligible person who requests that information and 3shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 4irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the fund 5to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 6benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 7shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 8receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 9subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 10person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 11year. The fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 12eligible person to notify him or her of the election.13    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 14elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 15amount that the fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 16receiving any pension benefit.17    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 18be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 19pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 20benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 21terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 22survivor, or other benefit.23    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 24benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 25under this Article, then:26        (1) Any benefits under the fund earned as a result of   SB3430- 20 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 2    person's creditable service arising from the return to 3    active service.4        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 5    repaid to the fund, and the terminated creditable service 6    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.7    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 8benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 9be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 10account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 11Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 12taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 13receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section must direct the fund to pay all of that payment as a 15rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 16under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.17    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 18receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section, the fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 20for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 21payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 22voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 23Fund to the fund, and the fund shall transfer the amount into 24the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.25    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 26rules, necessary to implement this Section.  SB3430- 21 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 2way that would cause the applicable fund to cease to be a 3qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 4    (40 ILCS 5/5-218.6 new)5    Sec. 5-218.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 6reduction in annual retirement annuity increases.7    (a) As used in this Section:8    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 9payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 10the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 11annuity and survivor's annuity using the formula applicable to 12the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 13increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 14formula provided under subsection (b-5).15    "Eligible person" means a person who:16        (1) is a Tier 1 member;17        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 18    annuity under this Article;19        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 20    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;21        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 22    Article; and23        (5) has not made the election under Section 5-218.5.24    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 25policeman before January 1, 2011.  SB3430- 22 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 330, 2030, the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension 4benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request 5of an eligible person, the Fund shall calculate, using 6actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 7an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 8that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 9have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 10annuity calculated in accordance with the formula provided 11under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 12benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 13made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 14a retirement annuity otherwise payable under this Article.15    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 16retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 17subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 18January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 19or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 20is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 21the originally granted retirement annuity.22    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 23benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 24then:25        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 26    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in   SB3430- 23 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 2    (b-5); and3        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 4    repaid to the Fund.5    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 6benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 7be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 8account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 9Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 10taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 11receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 12Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 13rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 14under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.15    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 16receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 17Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 18for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 19payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 20voucher to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount 21into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.22    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 23rules, necessary to implement this Section.24    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 25way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 26qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3430- 24 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (40 ILCS 5/6-213.5 new)2    Sec. 6-213.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 3of any pension benefit.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible person" means a person who:6        (1) has terminated service;7        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 8    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 9    Article;10        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 11    Article; and12        (4) has not made the election under Section 6-213.6.13    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 14or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 15anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 16entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 17"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 18disability benefits.19    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Fund shall 21calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 22adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 23for each eligible person who requests that information and 24shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 25irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund   SB3430- 25 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 2benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 3shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 4receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 5subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 6person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 7year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 8eligible person to notify him or her of the election.9    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 10elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 11amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 12receiving any pension benefit.13    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 14be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 15pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 16benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 17terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 18survivor, or other benefit.19    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 20benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 21under this Article, then:22        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 23    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 24    person's creditable service arising from the return to 25    active service.26        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be   SB3430- 26 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 2    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.3    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 4benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 5be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 6account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 7Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 8taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 9receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 10Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 11rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 12under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.13    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 14receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 16for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 17payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 18voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 19Fund to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount into 20the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.21    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 22rules, necessary to implement this Section.23    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 24way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 25qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986.   SB3430- 27 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (40 ILCS 5/6-213.6 new)2    Sec. 6-213.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 3reduction in annual retirement annuity increases.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 6payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 7the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 8annuity and survivor's annuity using the formula applicable to 9the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 10increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 11formula provided under subsection (b-5). "Eligible person" 12means a person who:13        (1) is a Tier 1 member;14        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 15    annuity under this Article;16        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 17    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;18        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 19    Article; and20        (5) has not made the election under Section 6-213.5.21    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a fireman 22under this Article before January 1, 2011.23    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 2530, 2030, the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension 26benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request   SB3430- 28 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1of an eligible person, the Fund shall calculate, using 2actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 3an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 4that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 5have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 6annuity calculated in accordance with the formula provided 7under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 8benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 9made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 10a retirement annuity otherwise payable under this Article.11    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 12retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 13subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 14January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 15or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 16is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 17the originally granted retirement annuity.18    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 19benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 20then:21        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 22    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 23    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 24    (b-5); and25        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 26    repaid to the Fund.  SB3430- 29 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 2benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 3be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 4account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 5Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 6taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 7receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 8Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 9rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 10under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.11    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 12receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 13Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 14for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 15payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 16voucher to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount 17into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.18    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 19rules, necessary to implement this Section.20    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 21way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 22qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 23    (40 ILCS 5/7-217.5 new)24    Sec. 7-217.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 25of any pension benefit.  SB3430- 30 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (a) As used in this Section:2    "Eligible person" means a person who:3        (1) has terminated service;4        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 5    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 6    Article;7        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 8    Article; and9        (4) has not made the election under Section 7-217.6.10    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 11or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 12anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 13entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 14"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 15disability benefits.16    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 17amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Fund shall 18calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 19adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 20for each eligible person who requests that information and 21shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 22irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 23to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 24benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 25shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 26receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a   SB3430- 31 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 2person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 3year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 4eligible person to notify him or her of the election.5    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 6elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 7amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 8receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 9an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 10not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 11Act with respect to service under this Article.12    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 13be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 14pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 15benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 16terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 17survivor, or other benefit.18    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 19benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 20under this Article, then:21        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 22    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 23    person's creditable service arising from the return to 24    active service.25        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 26    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service   SB3430- 32 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.2    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 3benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 4be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 5account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 6Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 7taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 8receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 9Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 10rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 11under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.12    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 13receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 14Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 15for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 16payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 17voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 18Fund to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount into 19the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.20    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 21rules, necessary to implement this Section.22    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 23way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 24qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 25    (40 ILCS 5/7-217.6 new)  SB3430- 33 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    Sec. 7-217.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 2reduction in annual retirement annuity and survivor's annuity 3increases.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 6payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 7the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 regular employee's 8retirement annuity and survivor's annuity using the formula 9applicable to the Tier 1 regular employee and the present 10value of the automatic annual increases to the Tier 1 regular 11employee's retirement annuity using the formula provided under 12subsection (b-5) and survivor's annuity using the formula 13provided under subsection (b-6). "Eligible person" means a 14person who:15        (1) is a Tier 1 regular employee;16        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 17    annuity under this Article;18        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 19    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;20        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 21    Article; and22        (5) has not made the election under Section 7-217.5.23    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 2530, 2030, the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension 26benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request   SB3430- 34 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1of an eligible person, the Fund shall calculate, using 2actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 3an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 4that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 5have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 6annuity calculated in accordance with the formula provided 7under subsection (b-5) and any increases in survivor's annuity 8payable to his or her survivor's annuity beneficiary 9calculated in accordance with the formula provided under 10subsection (b-6) in exchange for the accelerated pension 11benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 12made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 13a retirement annuity otherwise payable under this Article.14    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 15retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 16subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 17January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 18or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 19is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 20the originally granted retirement annuity.21    (b-6) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 22survivor's annuity payable to a survivor's annuity beneficiary 23of a person who made the election under subsection (b) shall be 24subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring on or 25after the first anniversary of the commencement of the 26annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of   SB3430- 35 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1the originally granted survivor's annuity.2    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 3benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 4then:5        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 6    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 7    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 8    (b-5); and9        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 10    repaid to the Fund.11    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 12benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 13be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 14account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 15Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 16taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 17receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 19rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 20under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.21    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 22receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 23Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 24for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 25payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 26voucher to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount   SB3430- 36 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.2    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 3rules, necessary to implement this Section.4    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 5way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 6qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 7    (40 ILCS 5/8-244.5 new)8    Sec. 8-244.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 9of any pension benefit.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Eligible person" means a person who:12        (1) has terminated service;13        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 14    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 15    Article;16        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 17    Article; and18        (4) has not made the election under Section 8-244.6.19    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 20or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 21anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 22entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 23"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's or 24disability benefits.25    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this   SB3430- 37 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Fund shall 2calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 3adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 4for each eligible person who requests that information and 5shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 6irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 7to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 8benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 9shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 10receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 11subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 12person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 13year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 14eligible person to notify him or her of the election.15    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 16elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 17amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 18receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 19an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 20not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 21Act with respect to service under this Article.22    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 23be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 24pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 25benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the 26terminated creditable service, including any retirement,   SB3430- 38 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1survivor, or other benefit.2    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 3benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 4under this Article, then:5        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 6    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 7    person's creditable service arising from the return to 8    active service.9        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 10    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 11    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.12    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 13benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 14be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 15account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 16Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 17taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 18receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 20rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 21under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.22    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 23receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 25for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 26payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the   SB3430- 39 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 2Fund to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount into 3the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.4    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 5rules, necessary to implement this Section.6    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 7way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 8qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 9    (40 ILCS 5/8-244.6 new)10    Sec. 8-244.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 11reduction in annual retirement annuity.12    (a) As used in this Section:13    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 14payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 15the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 16annuity using the formula applicable to the Tier 1 member and 17the present value of the automatic annual increases to the 18Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the formula provided 19under subsection (b-5).20    "Eligible person" means a person who:21        (1) is a Tier 1 member;22        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 23    annuity under this Article;24        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 25    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;  SB3430- 40 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 2    Article; and3        (5) has not made the election under Section 8-244.5.4    "Tier 1 member" means an employee who first became a 5participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 6system or pension fund established under this Code before 7January 1, 2011.8    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 9amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 1030, 2030, the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension 11benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request 12of an eligible person, the Fund shall calculate, using 13actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 14an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 15that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 16have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 17annuity calculated in accordance with the formula provided 18under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 19benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 20made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 21a retirement annuity otherwise payable under this Article.22    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 23retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 24subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the 25January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 26or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever   SB3430- 41 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 2the originally granted retirement annuity.3    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 4benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 5then:6        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 7    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 8    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 9    (b-5); and10        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 11    repaid to the Fund.12    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 13benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 14be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 15account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 16Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 17taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 18receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 19Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 20rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 21under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.22    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 23receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 24Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 25for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 26payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the   SB3430- 42 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1voucher to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount 2into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.3    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 4rules, necessary to implement this Section.5    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 6way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 7qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 8    (40 ILCS 5/11-223.5 new)9    Sec. 11-223.5. Accelerated pension benefit payment in lieu 10of any pension benefit.11    (a) As used in this Section:12    "Eligible person" means a person who:13        (1) has terminated service;14        (2) has accrued sufficient service credit to be 15    eligible to receive a retirement annuity under this 16    Article;17        (3) has not received any retirement annuity under this 18    Article; and19        (4) has not made the election under Section 11-223.6.20    "Pension benefit" means the benefits under this Article, 21or Article 1 as it relates to those benefits, including any 22anticipated annual increases, that an eligible person is 23entitled to upon attainment of the applicable retirement age. 24"Pension benefit" also includes applicable survivor's, 25widow's, or disability benefits.  SB3430- 43 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Fund shall 3calculate, using actuarial tables and other assumptions 4adopted by the Board, the present value of pension benefits 5for each eligible person who requests that information and 6shall offer each eligible person the opportunity to 7irrevocably elect to receive an amount determined by the Fund 8to be equal to 60% of the present value of his or her pension 9benefits in lieu of receiving any pension benefit. The offer 10shall specify the dollar amount that the eligible person will 11receive if he or she so elects and shall expire when a 12subsequent offer is made to an eligible person. An eligible 13person is limited to one calculation and offer per calendar 14year. The Fund shall make a good faith effort to contact every 15eligible person to notify him or her of the election.16    Until June 30, 2030, an eligible person may irrevocably 17elect to receive an accelerated pension benefit payment in the 18amount that the Fund offers under this subsection in lieu of 19receiving any pension benefit. A person who elects to receive 20an accelerated pension benefit payment under this Section may 21not elect to proceed under the Retirement Systems Reciprocal 22Act with respect to service under this Article.23    (c) A person's creditable service under this Article shall 24be terminated upon the person's receipt of an accelerated 25pension benefit payment under this Section, and no other 26benefit shall be paid under this Article based on the   SB3430- 44 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1terminated creditable service, including any retirement, 2survivor, widow, or other benefit.3    (d) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 4benefit payment under this Section returns to active service 5under this Article, then:6        (1) Any benefits under the Fund earned as a result of 7    that return to active service shall be based solely on the 8    person's creditable service arising from the return to 9    active service.10        (2) The accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 11    repaid to the Fund, and the terminated creditable service 12    may not under any circumstances be reinstated.13    (e) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 14benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 15be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 16account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 17Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 18taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 19receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 20Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 21rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 22under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.23    (f) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 24receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 25Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller 26for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit   SB3430- 45 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 2voucher from the Local Pension Obligation Acceleration Bond 3Fund to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount into 4the member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.5    (g) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 6rules, necessary to implement this Section.7    (h) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 8way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 9qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 10    (40 ILCS 5/11-223.6 new)11    Sec. 11-223.6. Accelerated pension benefit payment for a 12reduction in annual retirement annuity and widow's annuity 13increases.14    (a) As used in this Section:15    "Accelerated pension benefit payment" means a lump-sum 16payment equal to 70% of the difference of the present value of 17the automatic annual increases to a Tier 1 member's retirement 18annuity and widow's annuity using the formula applicable to 19the Tier 1 member and the present value of the automatic annual 20increases to the Tier 1 member's retirement annuity using the 21formula provided under subsection (b-5).22    "Eligible person" means a person who:23        (1) is a Tier 1 member;24        (2) has submitted an application for a retirement 25    annuity under this Article;  SB3430- 46 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1        (3) meets the age and service requirements for 2    receiving a retirement annuity under this Article;3        (4) has not received any retirement annuity under this 4    Article; and5        (5) has not made the election under Section 11-223.5.6    "Tier 1 member" means a person who first became a 7participant under this Article or any reciprocal retirement 8system or pension fund established under this Code before 9January 1, 2011.10    (b) As soon as practical after the effective date of this 11amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly and until June 1230, 2030, the Fund shall implement an accelerated pension 13benefit payment option for eligible persons. Upon the request 14of an eligible person, the Fund shall calculate, using 15actuarial tables and other assumptions adopted by the Board, 16an accelerated pension benefit payment amount and shall offer 17that eligible person the opportunity to irrevocably elect to 18have his or her automatic annual increases in retirement 19annuity calculated in accordance with the formula provided 20under subsection (b-5) in exchange for the accelerated pension 21benefit payment. The election under this subsection must be 22made before the eligible person receives the first payment of 23a retirement annuity otherwise payable under this Article.24    (b-5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 25retirement annuity of a person who made the election under 26subsection (b) shall be subject to annual increases on the   SB3430- 47 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1January 1 occurring either on or after the attainment of age 67 2or the first anniversary of the annuity start date, whichever 3is later. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 1.5% of 4the originally granted retirement annuity.5    (c) If a person who has received an accelerated pension 6benefit payment returns to active service under this Article, 7then:8        (1) the calculation of any future automatic annual 9    increase in retirement annuity shall be calculated in 10    accordance with the formula provided under subsection 11    (b-5); and12        (2) the accelerated pension benefit payment may not be 13    repaid to the Fund.14    (d) As a condition of receiving an accelerated pension 15benefit payment, the accelerated pension benefit payment must 16be transferred into a tax qualified retirement plan or 17account. The accelerated pension benefit payment under this 18Section may be subject to withholding or payment of applicable 19taxes, but to the extent permitted by federal law, a person who 20receives an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 21Section must direct the Fund to pay all of that payment as a 22rollover into another retirement plan or account qualified 23under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.24    (d-5) Upon receipt of a member's irrevocable election to 25receive an accelerated pension benefit payment under this 26Section, the Fund shall submit a voucher to the Comptroller   SB3430- 48 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1for payment of the member's accelerated pension benefit 2payment. The Comptroller shall transfer the amount of the 3voucher to the Fund, and the Fund shall transfer the amount 4into a member's eligible retirement plan or qualified account.5    (e) The Board shall adopt any rules, including emergency 6rules, necessary to implement this Section.7    (f) No provision of this Section shall be interpreted in a 8way that would cause the applicable Fund to cease to be a 9qualified plan under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986. 10    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 11Section 8.50 as follows: 12    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)13    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 148 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 15the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 16Act of the 104th General Assembly. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.  SB3430- 49 -LRB104 19288 RPS 32734 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new4    30 ILCS 330/2from Ch. 127, par. 6525    30 ILCS 330/2.56    30 ILCS 330/7.8 new7    40 ILCS 5/3-144.3 new8    40 ILCS 5/3-144.4 new9    40 ILCS 5/4-138.15 new10    40 ILCS 5/4-138.16 new11    40 ILCS 5/5-218.5 new12    40 ILCS 5/5-218.6 new13    40 ILCS 5/6-213.5 new14    40 ILCS 5/6-213.6 new15    40 ILCS 5/7-217.5 new16    40 ILCS 5/7-217.6 new17    40 ILCS 5/8-244.5 new18    40 ILCS 5/8-244.6 new19    40 ILCS 5/11-223.5 new20    40 ILCS 5/11-223.6 new21    30 ILCS 805/8.50 new